Hawaii, session 2025, SB1502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State offers a unique opportunity for job growth and economic development through its important geographic location.  During fiscal year 2022, the State received almost $9,000,000,000 in defense spending. Furthermore, from fiscal years 2018 to 2022, the number of defense-related jobs increased by about ten thousand.  Many of these jobs are in the areas of information technology, cybersecurity, intelligence, and data science, providing good‑paying jobs for the State's local economy.  To meet the growing demand for jobs in these fields, the State should utilize and invest in the expertise offered at the college of social sciences at the university of Hawaii at Manoa and the business administration program at the university of Hawaii, West Oahu campus. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the university of Hawaii to hire faculty at the college of social sciences at the university of Hawaii at Manoa and at the business administration program at the university of Hawaii‑West Oahu for workforce development to support the defense sector of the State's economy. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of the following positions: (1) full-time equivalent (     FTE) assistant professors in international economics, trade, and security; (2) full-time equivalent (     FTE) professor of practice in intelligence studies; (3) full-time equivalent (     FTE) educational specialist; and (4) full-time equivalent (     FTE) graduate research assistant, in the college of social sciences at the university of Hawaii at Manoa for workforce development in the defense sector of the State's economy. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for student housing, travel costs, material supplies, and operation of the academy for Hawaii intelligence studies summer program of the college of social sciences at the university of Hawaii at Manoa to develop a pipeline of talented students for workforce development in the defense sector of the State's economy. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of the following positions: (1) full-time equivalent (     FTE) faculty for the director of the cybersecurity coordination center; and (2) full-time equivalent (     FTE) faculty for the director of the cybersecurity research laboratory, for the business administration program at the university of Hawaii‑West Oahu for workforce development in the defense sector of the State's economy. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for student internship programs, certifications, software, and other related expenses for the business administration program at the university of Hawaii, West Oahu campus for workforce development in the defense sector of the State's economy. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.